Alabama, session 2026rs, HB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 40-18-310, 40-18-311, and
40-18-312, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
follows:
"§40-18-310
As used in this article, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:
(1) CATASTROPHE SAVINGS ACCOUNT. A regular savings
account or money market account established by an insurance
policyholder who is a state income taxpayer for residential
property in this state to cover:(i) an insurance deductible
under an insurance policy for the taxpayer's legal residence
propertyone residential property owned by a taxpayer that
covers hurricane, rising floodwaters, or other catastrophic
windstorm event damage or by an individual to cover
self-insured losses for the taxpayer's legal
residenceresidential property from a hurricane, rising
floodwaters, or other catastrophic windstorm event; (ii) the
annual cost of a FORTIFIED endorsement to supplement an
insurance policy; or (iii) the cost of mitigation actions that
Page 1

insurance policy; or (iii) the cost of mitigation actions that
HB27 Enrolled
would reduce the risk of hurricane, rising floodwaters, or
other catastrophic windstorm event damage, including, but not
limited to, costs associated with reroofing and obtaining
evaluation services to qualify for a FORTIFIED designation,
collectively, "Qualified Catastrophe Expenses.". The account
must be labeled as a catastrophe savings account in order to
qualify as a catastrophe savings account as defined in this
article. A taxpayer may establish only one catastrophe savings
account and shall specify that the purpose of the account is
to cover the amount of insurance deductibles and other
uninsured portions of risks of loss from hurricane, rising
floodwater, or other catastrophic windstorm eventQualified
Catastrophe Expenses.
(2) WINDSTORM EVENT. Windstorms, cyclones, hurricanes,
tornadoes, high winds, and hail, and similar perils not
normally among those covered under most property casualty
insurance policies but obtainable through the purchase of
wind, wind and hail, storm or windstorm coverage, or all."
"§40-18-311
(a) An individual taxpayer is allowed a deduction
against income earned for state income tax purposes imposed
pursuant to Section 40-18-5, for amounts contributed to a
catastrophe savings account in accordance with subsection (c)
and all interest income earned by a catastrophe savings
account is exempt from the tax imposed pursuant to Section
40-18-5.
(b) A catastrophe savings account is not subject to
attachment, levy, garnishment, or legal process in this state.
Page 2

attachment, levy, garnishment, or legal process in this state.
HB27 Enrolled
(c) The total amount that may be contributed to a
catastrophe savings account must not exceed any of the
following:
(1) In the case of an individual whose qualified
deductible is less than or equal to one thousand dollars
($1,000), two thousand dollars ($2,000), plus amounts to cover
other Qualified Catastrophe Expenses not to exceed fifteen
thousand dollars ($15,000).
(2) In the case of an individual whose qualified
deductible is greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000), the
amount equal to the lesser of fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000) or twice the amount of the taxpayer's qualified
deductible, plus amounts to cover other Qualified Catastrophe
Expenses not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
(3) In the case of a self-insured individual who
chooses not to obtain insurance on his or her legal
residenceresidential property, two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000), but in no event may the amount contributed
exceed the value of the individual taxpayer's legal
residenceresidential property.
(d) If a taxpayer contributes in excess of the limits
provided in subsection (c), the taxpayer shall withdraw the
amount of the excess contributions and include that amount in
Alabama income for purposes of Section 40-18-5 in the year of
withdrawal."
"§40-18-312
(a) A distribution from a catastrophe savings account
must be included in the income of the taxpayer unless the
Page 3

must be included in the income of the taxpayer unless the
HB27 Enrolled
amount of the distribution is used to cover qualified
catastrophe expensesQualified Catastrophe Expenses.
(b) No amount is included in income, pursuant to
subsection (a), if the qualified catastrophe expenses
Qualified Catastrophe Expenses of the taxpayer during the
taxable year are equal to or greater than the aggregate
distributions during the taxable year.
(c) If aggregate distributions exceed the qualified
catastrophe expensesQualified Catastrophe Expenses during the
taxable year, the amount otherwise included in income must be
reduced by the amount of the distributions for qualified
catastrophe expensesQualified Catastrophe Expenses.
(d)(1) The tax paid pursuant to Section 40-18-5,
attributable to a taxable distribution must be increased by
two and one-half percent of the amount which is includable in
100 income.
101 (2) This additional tax does not apply if any of the
102 following occur:
103 a. The taxpayer no longer owns a legal
104 residenceresidential property that qualifies pursuant to
105 Chapter 7.
106 b. The distribution is from an account conforming with
107 subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of Section 40-18-311(c)(3)
108 and is made on or after the date on which the taxpayer attains
109 the age of 70.
110 (3) If a taxpayer receives a nontaxable distribution
111 under this subsection, the taxpayer must not make further
112 contributions to any catastrophe savings account.
Page 4

contributions to any catastrophe savings account.
HB27 Enrolled
113 (e) If a taxpayer who owns a catastrophe savings
114 account dies, his or her account is included in the income of
115 the person who receives the account, unless that person is the
116 surviving spouse of the taxpayer. Upon the death of the
117 surviving spouse, the account is included in the income of the
118 person who receives the account. The additional tax in
119 subsection (d) does not apply to distribution on death of the
120 taxpayer or the surviving spouse."
121 Section 2. The provisions of this act apply to tax
122 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
123 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
124 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
HB27 Enrolled
125
126
127
128
129
130
131
132
133
134 ________________________________________________
135 Speaker of the House of Representatives
136
137
138
139 ________________________________________________
140 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
141
142
143 House of Representatives
144
145 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
146 was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.
147
148 John Treadwell
149 Clerk
150
151
152
153
154
155 Senate 10-Feb-26 Passed
156
157
158
Page 6